Utah statutes.
26-18-406.   Medicaid waiver for community service pilot program.

(1)  For purposes of this section, "community service pilot program" is a program in which the department:

(a)  identifies less than 100 Medicaid recipients who are capable of providing community services to others;

(b)  exempts a Medicaid recipient who is not capable of providing community services from the requirements of the community service pilot program;

(c)  identifies community services that the department will recognize for purposes of the pilot program; and

(d)  requires an individual identified under Subsection (1)(a) who is receiving Medicaid services to perform a certain number of hours of community service as a condition of receiving Medicaid benefits.

(2) (a)  The department shall develop a proposal to amend the state Medicaid plan to include a community service pilot program.

(b)  The department shall present the proposal for the community service pilot program to the Legislative Health and Human Services Interim Committee on or before November 30, 2011.

(3)  The department shall, by January 1, 2012, apply for a Medicaid waiver with the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services within the United States Department of Health and Human Services to implement a community service pilot program within the state Medicaid plan.



Enacted by Chapter 166, 2011 General Session

